Georgia, session 2025_26, HB816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
11 SECTION 1.
12 Short title.
13 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Greene County Public Facilities Authority
14 Act."
H. B. 816
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
15 SECTION 2.
16 Greene County Public Facilities Authority.
17 (a) There is hereby created a public body corporate and politic to be known as the "Greene
18 County Public Facilities Authority," which shall be deemed to be a political subdivision of
19 the state and a public corporation, and by that name, style, and title such body may contract
20 and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend
21 in all courts of law and equity. The authority shall have perpetual existence.
22 (b) The authority shall consist of five members who shall be appointed by the Board of
23 Commissioners of Greene County. Members of the Board of Commissioners of Greene
24 County may be appointed to the authority. With respect to initial appointments, each
25 member of the Board of Commissioners, including the chairperson, shall nominate an
26 individual for appointment to the authority. Commissioners may nominate themselves. Each
27 initial nominee appointed to the authority shall serve contemporaneously with the term of the
28 nominating commissioner, with such term expiring at the end of the existing term of the
29 commissioner. Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for terms of four years and until
30 their successors are appointed and qualified. Immediately after such appointments, the
31 members of the authority shall enter upon their duties. To be eligible for appointment as a
32 member of the authority, a person shall be at least 21 years of age and a resident of Greene
33 County, Georgia, for at least two years prior to the date of his or her appointment and shall
34 not have been convicted of a felony. Any member of the authority may be selected and
35 appointed to succeed himself or herself.
36 (c) The members shall not be compensated for their services; provided, however, that such
37 members shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the
38 performance of their duties.
39 (d) The members of the authority shall elect one of their number as chairperson and another
40 as vice chairperson. The members of the authority shall also elect a secretary, who need not
H. B. 816
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
41 be a member of the authority, and may also elect a treasurer, who need not be a member of
42 the authority. The secretary may also serve as treasurer. If the secretary and treasurer are
43 not members of the authority, such officers shall have no voting rights; and each shall serve
44 for a period of one year and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
45 (e) Three members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. No vacancy on the authority
46 shall impair the right of the quorum to exercise all of the rights and perform all of the duties
47 of the authority.
48 SECTION 3.
49 Definitions.
50 As used in this Act, the term:
51 (1) "Authority" means the Greene County Public Facilities Authority created by this Act.
52 (2) "Costs of the project" means and embraces the cost of construction; the cost of all
53 lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired; the cost of all machinery and
54 equipment; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction and for six months
55 after completion of construction; the cost of engineering, architectural, fiscal agents'
56 expenses, legal expenses, plans and specifications, and other expenses necessary or
57 incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative
58 expenses and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing
59 authorized in this Act; working capital; and all other costs necessary to acquire, construct,
60 add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and maintain the project.
61 (3) "County" means Greene County, Georgia.
62 (4) "Project" means all buildings, facilities, and equipment necessary or convenient for
63 the efficient operation of the county or any department, agency, division, or commission
64 thereof, the Greene County School District, any municipal corporation within the county,
65 and any undertaking permitted by the Revenue Bond Law.
H. B. 816
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
66 (5) "Revenue Bond Law" means Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A., the
67 "Revenue Bond Law."
68 (6) "Revenue bonds" means revenue bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to the
69 Revenue Bond Law.
70 (7) "Self-liquidating" means any project from which the revenues and earnings to be
71 derived by the authority therefrom, including, but not limited to, any contractual
72 payments with governmental or private entities, and all properties used, leased, and sold
73 in connection herewith, together with any grants, will be sufficient to pay the costs of
74 operating, maintaining, and repairing the project and to pay the principal and interest on
75 the revenue bonds or other obligations which may be issued for the purpose of paying the
76 costs of the project.
77 (8) "State" means the State of Georgia.
78 SECTION 4.
79 Powers.
80 The authority shall have the power:
81 (1) To have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;
82 (2) To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, condemnation, or otherwise and to hold, operate,
83 maintain, lease, and dispose of real and personal property of every kind and character for
84 its corporate purposes;
85 (3) To acquire in its own name by purchase on such terms and conditions and in such
86 manner as it may deem proper or by condemnation in accordance with the provisions of
87 any and all existing laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, real
88 property, or rights or easements therein, or franchises necessary or convenient for its
89 corporate purposes; to use the same so long as its corporate existence shall continue; and
90 to lease or make contracts with respect to the use of or disposal of the same in any
H. B. 816
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
91 manner it deems to the best advantage of the authority. The authority shall be under no
92 obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned under this Act except from the
93 funds provided under the authority of this Act. In any proceedings to condemn, such
94 orders may be made by the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action, or proceedings
95 as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned. No
96 property shall be acquired under the provisions of this Act upon which any lien or
97 encumbrance exists, unless, at the time such property is so acquired, a sufficient sum of
98 money is to be deposited in trust to pay and redeem the fair value of such lien or
99 encumbrance;
100 (4) To appoint, select, and employ officers, agents, and employees, including
101 engineering, architectural, and construction experts, fiscal agents, and attorneys, and to
102 fix their respective compensations;
103 (5) To execute contracts, leases, installment sale agreements, and other agreements and
104 instruments necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, construction,
105 addition, extension, improvement, equipping, operation, or maintenance of a project; and
106 any and all persons, firms, corporations, and Greene County are hereby authorized to
107 enter into contracts, leases, installment sale agreements, and other agreements or
108 instruments with the authority upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem
109 advisable and as they are authorized by law;
110 (6) To acquire, construct, add to, extend, improve, equip, hold, operate, maintain, lease,
111 and dispose of projects;
112 (7) To pay the costs of the project with the proceeds of revenue bonds or other
113 obligations issued by the authority or from any grant or contribution from the United
114 States or any agency or instrumentality thereof or from this state or any agency or any
115 instrumentality or other political subdivision thereof or from any other source
116 whatsoever;
H. B. 816
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
117 (8) To accept loans or grants of money, materials, or property of any kind from the
118 United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, upon such terms and conditions
119 as the United States or such agency or instrumentality may require;
120 (9) To accept loans or grants of money, materials, or property of any kind from this state
121 or any agency or instrumentality or political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof,
122 upon such terms and conditions as this state or such agency or instrumentality or political
123 subdivision or municipal corporation may require;
124 (10) To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue revenue bonds, notes
125 and other forms of obligation, deeds to secure debt, security agreements, and other
126 instruments as may be necessary or convenient to evidence and secure such borrowing,
127 and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;
128 (11) To exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar
129 functions, including the power to incur short-term debt and to approve, execute, and
130 deliver appropriate evidence of any such indebtedness;
131 (12) To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the
132 manner in which its business is transacted;
133 (13) To prescribe rules, regulations, service policies, and procedures for the operation
134 of any project; and
135 (13) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in
136 this Act.
137 SECTION 5.
138 Revenue bonds.
139 The authority, or any authority or body which has or which may in the future succeed to the
140 powers, duties, and liabilities vested in the authority created by this Act, shall have power
141 and is authorized, pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law, to provide by resolution for the
H. B. 816
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
142 issuance of revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of paying all or any part of the
143 costs of a project and for the purpose of refunding revenue bonds or other obligations
144 previously issued. Revenue bonds shall be undertaken, issued, priced, validated, sold, paid,
145 redeemed, refunded, secured, and replaced in accordance with the provisions of the Revenue
146 Bond Law. The principal and interest on revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the
147 revenues and properties pledged to the payment of such bonds. Revenue bonds issued by the
148 authority shall contain terms the authority determines are in the best interest of the authority,
149 provided no revenue bonds shall have a maturity exceeding 40 years.
150 SECTION 6.
151 Revenue bonds; signatures; seal.
152 All revenue bonds shall bear the manual or facsimile signature of the chairperson or vice
153 chairperson of the authority and the attesting manual or facsimile signature of the secretary
154 or treasurer of the authority, and the official seal of the authority shall be impressed or
155 imprinted thereon. Any revenue bonds may bear the manual or facsimile signature of such
156 persons as at the actual time of execution of the revenue bonds shall be duly authorized or
157 hold the proper office, although at the date of issuance of the revenue bonds the person may
158 not have been authorized or held the office. In case any officer whose signature appears on
159 any revenue bonds ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature shall
160 be valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if the officer had remained in office until delivery.
H. B. 816
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
161 SECTION 7.
162 Revenue bonds; negotiability; exemption from taxation.
163 All revenue bonds shall have, and are declared to have, all the qualities and incidents of
164 negotiable instruments under the laws of this state. All revenue bonds and their transfer and
165 income shall be exempt from all taxation within the state.
166 SECTION 8.
167 Revenue bonds; conditions precedent to issuance.
168 The authority shall adopt a resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds. In the
169 resolution, the authority shall determine that the project financed with the proceeds of such
170 revenue bonds is self-liquidating. Revenue bonds may be issued without any other
171 proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings,
172 conditions, and things which are specified or required by this Act. Any resolution providing
173 for the issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of this Act shall become effective
174 immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted, and any such resolution
175 may be passed at any regular, special, or adjourned meeting of the authority.
176 SECTION 9.
177 Credit not pledged.
178 Revenue bonds of the authority shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of Greene County
179 or the State of Georgia, nor a pledge of the faith and credit of this state or such county, but
180 such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the fund hereinafter provided for. The
181 issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate this
182 state or such county to levy or pledge any form of taxation whatsoever for payment of such
H. B. 816
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
183 revenue bonds or to make any appropriation for their payment, and all such revenue bonds
184 shall contain recitals on their face covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this
185 section. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, this Act shall not affect the ability of the
186 authority and any political subdivision to enter into an intergovernmental contract pursuant
187 to which the political subdivision agrees to pay amounts sufficient to pay operating charges
188 and other costs of the authority or any project including, without limitation, the principal of
189 and interest on revenue bonds in consideration for services or facilities of the authority.
190 SECTION 10.
191 Trust indenture as security.
192 In the discretion of the authority, any issuance of revenue bonds may be secured by a trust
193 indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust
194 company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without this state. Either
195 the resolution providing for the issuance of the revenue bonds or such trust indenture may
196 contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the
197 bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including
198 covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition and
199 construction of the project, the maintenance, operation, repair, and insuring of the project,
200 and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all money.
201 SECTION 11.
202 Trust indenture as security; remedies of bondholders.
203 Any holder of revenue bonds and the trustee under the trust indenture, if any, except to the
204 extent that the rights given herein may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance
205 of the revenue bonds or by the trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action,
H. B. 816
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
206 mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights it may have under
207 the laws of the state, including specifically, but without limitation, the Revenue Bond Law,
208 or granted hereunder or under such resolution or trust indenture and may enforce and compel
209 performance of all duties required by this Act or by such resolution or trust indenture to be
210 performed by the authority or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and
211 collecting of revenues, fees, tolls, fines, and other charges for the use of the facilities and
212 services furnished.
213 SECTION 12.
214 Trust indenture as security; validation.
215 Revenue bonds and the security therefor shall be issued, confirmed, and validated in
216 accordance with the provisions of the Revenue Bond Law. The petition for validation shall
217 also make any political subdivision of the state party defendant to such action if the political
218 subdivision has contracted with the authority for services or facilities relating to the project
219 for which revenue bonds are to be issued and sought to be validated, and such defendant shall
220 be required to show cause, if any exists, as to why such contract or contracts shall not be
221 adjudicated as a part of the basis for the security for the payment of any such revenue bonds.
222 The revenue bonds, when validated, and the judgment of validation shall be final and
223 conclusive with respect to such revenue bonds and the security for the payment thereof and
224 interest thereon and against the authority and all other defendants.
225 SECTION 13.
226 To whom proceeds of bonds shall be paid.
227 In the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, the
228 authority shall provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the revenue bonds to
H. B. 816
- 10 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
229 any officer or person who, or any agency, bank, or trust company which, shall act as trustee
230 of such funds and shall hold and apply the same to the purposes thereof, subject to such
231 regulations as this Act and such resolution or trust indenture may provide.
232 SECTION 14.
233 Venue and jurisdiction.
234 Any action to protect or enforce any rights under the provisions of this Act or any suit or
235 action against such authority shall be brought in the Superior Court of Greene County, and
236 any action pertaining to validation of any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this
237 Act shall likewise be brought in said court which shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction
238 of such actions.
239 SECTION 15.
240 Interest of bondholders protected.
241 While any of the revenue bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers
242 duties, or existence of such authority or its officers, employees, or agents shall not be
243 diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the
244 holders of such revenue bonds; and no other entity, department, agency, or authority shall
245 be created which will compete with the authority to such an extent as to affect adversely the
246 interests and rights of the holders of such revenue bonds, nor shall the state itself so compete
247 with the authority. The provisions of this Act shall be for the benefit of the authority and the
248 holders of any such revenue bonds, and upon the issuance of such revenue bonds under the
249 provisions of this Act, shall constitute a contract with the holders of such revenue bonds.
H. B. 816
- 11 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
250 SECTION 16.
251 Money received considered trust funds.
252 All money received pursuant to the authority of this Act, whether as proceeds from the sale
253 of revenue bonds, as grants or other contributions, or as revenue, income, fees, and earnings,
254 shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Act.
255 SECTION 17.
256 Purpose of the authority; reversion upon dissolution.
257 (a) The authority is created for the purpose of promoting the public good and general welfare
258 of the citizens of Greene County, and financing and providing public buildings, facilities,
259 equipment, and services within the county, for sale to, lease or sublease to, ownership, or
260 operation by the county as otherwise authorized by law.
261 (b) Upon the dissolution of the authority, all assets owned by the authority shall become the
262 property of the county.
263 SECTION 18.
264 Rates, charges, and revenues; use.
265 The authority is hereby authorized to prescribe and fix rates and to revise the same from time
266 to time and to collect revenues, tolls, fees, and charges for the services, facilities, and
267 commodities furnished and, in anticipation of the collection of the revenues, to issue revenue
268 bonds or other types of obligations as provided in this Act to finance, in whole or in part, the
269 costs of the project and to pledge to the punctual payment of said revenue bonds or other
270 obligations all or any part of the revenues.
H. B. 816
- 12 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
271 SECTION 19.
272 Rules, regulations, service policies, and procedures for operation of projects.
273 It shall be the duty of the authority to prescribe rules, regulations, service policies, and
274 procedures for the operation of any project or projects constructed or acquired under the
275 provisions of this Act. The authority may adopt bylaws.
276 SECTION 20.
277 Tort immunity.
278 To the extent permitted by law, the authority shall have the same immunity and exemption
279 from liability for torts and negligence as Greene County; and the officers, agents, and
280 employees of the authority when in the performance of the work of the authority shall have
281 the same immunity and exemption from liability for torts and negligence as the officers,
282 agents, and employees of Greene County when in the performance of their public duties or
283 work of the county.
284 SECTION 21.
285 Tax exemption.
286 The income of the authority, the properties of the authority, both real and personal, and all
287 revenue bonds, certificates of participation, notes, and other forms of obligations issued by
288 the authority shall be exempt from all state and local taxes and special assessments of any
289 kind to the extent permitted by and in accordance with the general laws of the state.
H. B. 816
- 13 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
290 SECTION 22.
291 Effect on other governments.
292 This Act shall not and does not in any way take from Greene County or any county or
293 municipal corporation the authority to own, operate, and maintain public facilities or to issue
294 revenue bonds as provided by the Revenue Bond Law.
295 SECTION 23.
296 Liberal construction of Act.
297 This Act, being for the welfare of various political subdivisions of this state and its
298 inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.
299 SECTION 24.
300 Severability; effect of partial invalidity of Act.
301 The provisions of this Act are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held
302 unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of such court shall not
303 affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.
304 SECTION 25.
305 Effective date.
306 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
307 without such approval.
H. B. 816
- 14 -

25 LC 62 0159/AP
308 SECTION 26.
309 General repealer.
310 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 816
- 15 -